Hawaii statutes.
[§321-11.51] Sanitation permits;
transfer. Sanitation permits that have not expired as of July 2,
1997, shall be transferable upon the sale of a food establishment; provided
that such transfers are subject to the new owner agreeing to abide by the compliance
schedule of the department of health. [L 1997, c 334, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 2,
1997," substituted for "the effective date of this Act".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next